Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1714
Application for postponement of trial; condition.

When an application shall be made to a court of record to postpone a trial, the payment to the adverse party of a sum not exceeding ten dollars, besides the costs of the term, may in the discretion of the judges be imposed as a condition of granting the postponement.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 8173;

C.S.1922, § 9124;

C.S.1929, § 20-1714;

R.S.1943, § 25-1714.

Awarding costs is discretionary with court. Coombs v. Brenklander, 29 Neb. 586, 45 N.W. 929 (1890).